test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-J-С_В-бельё_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - бельё M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      белье+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: бельё
      белье+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: бельё
      белье+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: белья́
      белье+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: белье́
      белье+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: белью́
      белье+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: бельём
